Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1020
Aid allocation adjustments; department; duties.

Nothing in the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act shall be construed as altering, amending, or changing in any manner the duties or obligations of the department under section 79-1065, and the provisions of the act shall not be construed as relieving the department of its obligation to make appropriate aid allocation adjustments following a final determination of the amount of funds due to any school district or local system under the provisions of or through the operation of the act.

Laws 1995, LB 542, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3811.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 666;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 28;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 26.